Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.100

Disciplinary action—Grounds.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any applicant or licensee under this chapter if the licensee or applicant:

(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW;

(2) Has engaged in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.300.030 without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter;

(3) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter;

(4) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it; or

(5) Has been found to have violated RCW 70.54.355.

[ 2019 c 307 s 2; 2009 c 412 s 11.]